Florida, session 2026, HB781.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 409.90631, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
409.90631 Coverage of blood pressure monitors and cuffs
for Medicaid recipients.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "blood pressure
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb781-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 781 2026
monitor and cuff" means a device designed for the purpose of
aiding in the treatment of hypertension by measuring blood
pressure levels through a validated blood pressure measurement
device at home or elsewhere outside the clinic setting.
(2) Subject to the availability of funds and subject to
any limitations or directions provided in the General
Appropriations Act, the agency must provide coverage for blood
pressure monitors and cuffs under the Medicaid pharmacy benefit
for the treatment of a Medicaid recipient if:
(a) The recipient has been diagnosed by his or her primary
care physician, or another licensed health care practitioner
authorized to make such diagnosis, with hypertension that may be
treated with medication; and
(b) A health care practitioner with the applicable
prescribing authority has prescribed medication to treat the
recipient's hypertension and a validated blood pressure monitor
and cuff to assist the recipient and practitioner in managing
the recipient's hypertension.
(3) Coverage under this section includes the cost of any
necessary repairs or replacement parts for the blood pressure
monitor and cuff.
(4) To qualify for continued coverage under this section,
the Medicaid recipient must participate in follow-up care with
his or her treating health care practitioner, in person or
through telehealth, at least once every 6 months during the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb781-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 781 2026
first 18 months after the first prescription of the blood
pressure monitor and cuff for the recipient has been issued
under this section, to assess the efficacy of using the blood
pressure monitor and cuff for treatment of his or her
hypertension. After the first 18 months, such follow-up care
must occur at least once every 12 months.
(5) The agency shall seek federal approval, if needed, for
the implementation of this section.
Section 2. The Agency for Health Care Administration shall
include the rate impact of this act in the Medicaid managed
medical assistance program and long-term care managed care
program rates, as applicable, that take effect on or after
October 1, 2026.
Section 3. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb781-00